Maine, session 132, LD157.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §10206, sub-§11, as amended by PL 2023, c. 228, §2, is repealed.
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §10268 is enacted to read:
§10268. Fish and Wildlife Management Education Fund
The department shall deposit $1 of every hunting license and trapping license fee
collected pursuant to sections 11109, 11109‑A and 12201 in a separate account within the
department, to be known as the Fish and Wildlife Management Education Fund. The fund
is nonlapsing. The department shall use money in the fund on an annual basis to educate
the public on the management of game species of fish and wildlife and to communicate
with the public about department programs. The department may contract with a private
entity to provide this education. Education provided pursuant to this section may include
information about how hunting and fishing help to manage specific species. The
department may continue its activities pursuant to this section during ballot initiative
campaigns concerning fish and wildlife issues. The funds may also be used for education
programs for youth or families that promote participation in hunting, fishing, trapping or
other outdoor recreational activities.
Sec. 3. 12 MRSA §10902, sub-§6, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 414, Pt. A, §2
and affected by c. 614, §9, is amended to read:
D. Discharging a firearm or archery equipment within 100 yards of a residential
dwelling without owner permission, in violation of section 11209;
Sec. 4. 12 MRSA §11154, sub-§6, as amended by PL 2011, c. 370, §6, is further
amended to read:
6. Application procedure. An eligible person wishing to apply for a permit must file
a written an application for a permit on a form furnished by the commissioner. The
application fee is nonrefundable. A person may not file no more than one application. A
person who submits more than one application is disqualified from the selection of
permittees. The application must be accompanied by an application fee of:
Page 1 - 132LR0244(03)

A. For a resident:
(1) Fifteen dollars for a one-chance application; or
B. For a nonresident:
(1) Fifteen dollars for a one-chance application;
(2) Twenty-five dollars for a 3-chance application;
(3) Thirty-five dollars for a 6-chance application; and
(4) Fifty-five dollars for a 10-chance application; multiple 10-chance options may
be purchased.
A clerk or agent appointed by the commissioner under section 10801 may process an
application under this subsection. The clerk or agent shall charge a fee of $2 for each
application under this subsection processed by that clerk or agent.
The commissioner shall allow an applicant to indicate that that applicant does not want to
receive a moose permit pursuant to the application but wishes to receive the corresponding
points under subsection 8 for that application.
Sec. 5. 12 MRSA §12201, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2023, c. 646, Pt. A, §16, is
further amended to read:
3. Successful completion of trapper education program required for license.
Except as provided in paragraph A, a person who applies for a state license to trap, other
than a junior trapping license pursuant to subsection 2, paragraph B or an apprentice trapper
license issued under section 12204, must submit proof of having successfully completed a
trapper education course of the type described in section 10108, subsection 7 or satisfactory
evidence of having previously held an adult license to trap in this State or any other state,
province or country in any year beginning in or after 1978. If a person submits satisfactory
evidence of having previously held an adult license to trap in any other state, province or
country, the person must also submit proof of having successfully completed a trapper
education course comparable to the type described in section 10108, subsection 7.
When proof or evidence can not cannot otherwise be provided, the person may substitute a
signed affidavit that that person has previously held the required adult trapping license or
that that person has successfully completed the required trapper education course.
A. A person who is an enrolled member of the Passamaquoddy Tribe, the Penobscot
Nation, the Houlton Band of Maliseet Indians or the Mi'kmaq Nation who presents
certification from the respective reservation chief or governor or the Mi'kmaq Nation
Tribal Council stating that the person is an enrolled member of a federally recognized
nation, band or tribe listed in this paragraph is exempt from the requirements of this
subsection.
Sec. 6. 12 MRSA §12663-B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 231, §1, is further amended
to read:
§12663-B. Unlawful sale of lead sinkers, bare lead jigs and painted lead jigs
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Bare lead jig" means an unpainted lead jig that contains lead and that:
Page 2 - 132LR0244(03)

(1) Weighs one ounce or less; or
(2) Measures 2 1/2 inches or less in length.
B. "Lead sinker" means a device that contains lead that is designed to be attached to a
fishing line and intended to sink the line and that: does not include artificial lures,
ice-fishing sounders, weighted line, weighted flies or jig heads.
(1) Weighs one ounce or less; or
(2) Measures 2 1/2 inches or less in length.
"Lead sinker" does not include artificial lures, weighted line, weighted flies or jig
heads.
C. "Painted lead jig" means a painted lead jig that contains lead and that:
(1) Weighs one ounce or less; or
(2) Measures 2 1/2 inches or less in length.
D. "Lead jig" means a hook with a lead weight molded to it, regardless of whether it
is painted, coated or covered by some other substance or by attached skirts. "Lead jig"
does not include a fishing-related item, including, but not limited to, lead-core line,
spinnerbaits, buzzbaits, spoons, poppers, plugs or flies.
2. Sale of lead sinker, bare lead jig or painted lead jig. This subsection governs the
sale of lead sinkers, bare lead jigs and painted lead jigs.
A. A person may not:
(1) Sell a lead sinker;
(2) Beginning September 1, 2016, sell a bare lead jig; or
(3) Beginning September 1, 2024, sell a painted lead jig.
B. A person who violates this subsection commits a civil violation for which a fine of
not less than $100 nor more than $500 may be adjudged.
C. A person who violates this subsection after having been adjudicated as having
committed 3 or more civil violations under this Part within the previous 5-year period
commits a Class E crime.
3. Offer lead sinker, bare lead jig or painted lead jig for sale. This subsection
governs offering lead sinkers, bare lead jigs and painted lead jigs for sale.
A. A person may not:
(1) Offer for sale a lead sinker;
(2) Beginning September 1, 2016, offer for sale a bare lead jig; or
(3) Beginning September 1, 2024, offer for sale a painted lead jig.
B. A person who violates this subsection commits a civil violation for which a fine of
not less than $100 nor more than $500 may be adjudged.
C. A person who violates this subsection after having been adjudicated as having
committed 3 or more civil violations under this Part within the previous 5-year period
commits a Class E crime.
Page 3 - 132LR0244(03)

4. Sell or offer for sale lead sinker or lead jig. This subsection governs the sale or
offering for sale of lead sinkers and lead jigs.
A. A person may not sell or offer for sale a lead sinker or unpainted lead jig that:
(1) Weighs one ounce or less; or
(2) Measures 2 1/2 inches or less in length.
B. A person who violates this subsection commits a civil violation for which a fine of
not less than $100 nor more than $500 may be adjudged.
C. A person who violates this subsection after having been adjudicated as having
committed 3 or more civil violations under this Part within the previous 5-year period
commits a Class E crime.
Sec. 7. 12 MRSA §12664, as amended by PL 2023, c. 231, §2, is further amended
to read:
§12664. Unlawful use of lead sinkers, bare lead jigs and painted lead jigs
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Bare lead jig" means an unpainted lead jig that contains lead and that:
(1) Weighs one ounce or less; or
(2) Measures 2 1/2 inches or less in length.
B. "Lead sinker" means a device that contains lead that is designed to be attached to a
fishing line and intended to sink the line and that: does not include artificial lures,
ice-fishing sounders, weighted line, weighted flies or jig heads.
(1) Weighs one ounce or less; or
(2) Measures 2 1/2 inches or less in length.
"Lead sinker" does not include artificial lures, weighted line, weighted flies or jig
heads.
C. "Painted lead jig" means a painted lead jig that contains lead and that:
(1) Weighs one ounce or less; or
(2) Measures 2 1/2 inches or less in length.
D. "Lead jig" means a hook with a lead weight molded to it, regardless of whether it
is painted, coated or covered by some other substance or by attached skirts. "Lead jig"
does not include a fishing-related lead item, including, but not limited to, a lead core
line, spinnerbaits, buzzbaits, spoons, poppers, plugs or flies.
2. Unlawful use. This subsection governs the use of lead sinkers, bare lead jigs and
painted lead jigs.
A. A person may not:
(1) Use a lead sinker;
(2) Beginning September 1, 2017, use a bare lead jig; or
(3) Beginning September 1, 2026, use a painted lead jig.
Page 4 - 132LR0244(03)

A-1. A person may not use a lead sinker or unpainted lead jig that:
(1) Weighs one ounce or less; or
(2) Measures 2 1/2 inches or less in length.
B. A person who violates this subsection commits a civil violation for which a fine of
not less than $100 nor more than $500 may be adjudged.
C. A person who violates this subsection after having been adjudicated as having
committed 3 or more civil violations under this Part within the previous 5-year period
commits a Class E crime.
Sec. 8. 12 MRSA §12708, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2021, c. 184, §§10 to
12, is further amended by enacting a new subparagraph (4-A) to read:
(4-A) Caribou Stream WMA - Washburn, Woodland - Aroostook County;
Sec. 9. 12 MRSA §12708, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2021, c. 184, §§10 to
12, is further amended by enacting a new subparagraph (18-A) to read:
(18-A) Lexington WMA - Lexington Township - Somerset County;
Sec. 10. 12 MRSA §12708, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2021, c. 184, §§10 to
12, is further amended by enacting a new subparagraph (19-A) to read:
(19-A) Macwahoc WMA - Upper Molunkus Township, North Yarmouth
Academy Grant Township (T1 R4 WELS) - Aroostook County;
Sec. 11. 12 MRSA §12708, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2021, c. 184, §§10 to
12, is further amended by enacting a new subparagraph (35-A) to read:
(35-A) Rangeley WMA - Rangeley - Franklin County;
Sec. 12. 12 MRSA §12708, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2021, c. 184, §§10 to
12, is further amended by repealing subparagraph (46).
Sec. 13. 12 MRSA §12953, sub-§7, as amended by PL 2017, c. 164, §24, is further
amended to read:
7. Renewal Expiration and renewal of license; fees. Licenses Prior to January 1,
2026, licenses issued pursuant to this section expire 3 years from the date of issuance unless
revoked sooner. Beginning January 1, 2026, a taxidermist license entitles a person to
practice the art of taxidermy through the remainder of the calendar year in which the license
was issued plus 2 calendar years unless revoked sooner. A taxidermist whose license is
not suspended or revoked may renew the license every 3 years upon application by the
licensee accompanied by a $77 license fee.
Sec. 14. 12 MRSA §13068-A, sub-§14, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 655, Pt. B, §380
and affected by §422, is amended to read:
14. Operating motorboat watercraft in bathing swim areas. The following
provisions apply to operating a motorboat watercraft in a bathing swim area.
A. A person may not:
(1) Operate a motorboat watercraft within a bathing swim area marked or buoyed
for bathing swimming; or
Page 5 - 132LR0244(03)

(2) Operate an airmobile on a beach adjacent to a bathing swim area marked or
buoyed for bathing swimming.
B. The following penalties apply to violations of this subsection.
(1) A person who violates this subsection commits a civil violation for which a
fine of not less than $100 nor more than $500 may be adjudged.
(2) A person who violates this subsection after having been adjudicated as having
committed 3 or more civil violations under this Part within the previous 5-year
period commits a Class E crime.
Page 6 - 132LR0244(03)